Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB4110.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 11, chapter 3, article 2, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 11-459.02, to read: START_STATUTE11-459.02. Sheriff's deputy officers; detention officers; serious mental illness training A. Each county sheriff shall require that each sheriff's deputy and detention officer and any other employee of the sheriff's office who has direct, routine interaction with a prisoner complete a serious mental illness training program that is developed or approved by the Arizona Health Care Cost Containment System mental health commissioner. The training must include psychosis-specific content and instruction that is appropriate for high-acuity correctional environments. B. A New sheriff's deputy or detention officer or employee of the sheriff's office who has direct and routine interaction with a prisoner shall complete the training within six months after the date of hire.  All sheriff's deputies, detention officers and employees shall complete a refresher training course at least once every two years. C. The sheriff shall maintain records of each sheriff's deputy's, detention officer's and employee's compliance and make those records available for inspection by the county board of supervisors and the arizona health care cost containment system mental health commissioner. D. The arizona health care cost containment system mental health commissioner shall develop or approve the training curriculum in consultation with all of the following: 1. At least one psychiatrist who is licensed pursuant to title 32, chapters 13 or 17 and who has expertise in acute psychosis and anosognosia. 2. At least one registered nurse who is licensed pursuant to title 32, chapter 15 and who has a minimum of five years' experience in civil psychiatric inpatient or emergency psychiatric settings. 3. An Advocacy organization that represents families affected by serious mental illness and high-acuity psychosis. 4. An Organization whose primary mission is general mental health awareness. E. The training must include evidence-based instruction on all of the following: 1. Recognition of acute psychosis, anosognosia, loss of insight and clinical deterioration. 2. Violence risk factors that are associated with untreated psychosis and communication, safety and de-escalation strategies appropriate for correctional settings. 3. |Emergency and involuntary treatment procedures, including evaluation and court-ordered treatment. 4. Procedures for a clinical referral, documentation and escalation to mental health personnel. 5. The perspective of the family of a person with serious mental illness, including barriers to treatment and circumstances in which families repeatedly seek help before crises or tragedies. 6. Systemic factors contributing to the presence of individuals with serious mental illness in correctional settings. 7. The role of correctional facilities as de facto mental health institutions and the importance of empathy, professionalism and understanding toward individuals experiencing severe mental illness. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Title 41, chapter 11, article 6, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 41-1663, to read: START_STATUTE41-1663. Correctional officers; serious mental illness training A. The director shall require that each correctional officer who has direct, routine interaction with an inmate complete a serious mental illness training program that is developed or approved by the Arizona Health Care Cost Containment System mental health commissioner. The training must include psychosis-specific content and instruction that is appropriate for high-acuity correctional environments. B. A new correctional officer who has direct and routine interaction with an inmate shall complete the training within six months after the date of hire.  All correctional officers shall complete a refresher training course at least once every two years. C. The director shall maintain records of each correctional officer's compliance and make those records available for inspection by the department and the arizona health care cost containment system mental health commissioner. D. The arizona health care cost containment system mental health commissioner shall develop or approve the training curriculum in consultation with all of the following: 1. At least one psychiatrist who is licensed pursuant to title 32, chapters 13 or 17 and who has expertise in acute psychosis and anosognosia. 2. At least one registered nurse who is licensed pursuant to title 32, chapter 15 and who has a minimum of five years' experience in civil psychiatric inpatient or emergency psychiatric settings. 3. An Advocacy organization that represents families affected by serious mental illness and high-acuity psychosis. 4. An Organization whose primary mission is general mental health awareness. E. The training must include evidence-based instruction on all of the following: 1. Recognition of acute psychosis, anosognosia, loss of insight and clinical deterioration. 2. Violence risk factors that are associated with untreated psychosis and communication, safety and de-escalation strategies appropriate for correctional settings. 3. |Emergency and involuntary treatment procedures, including evaluation and court-ordered treatment. 4. Procedures for a clinical referral, documentation and escalation to mental health personnel. 5. The perspective of the family of a person with serious mental illness, including barriers to treatment and circumstances in which families repeatedly seek help before crises or tragedies. 6. Systemic factors contributing to the presence of individuals with serious mental illness in correctional settings. 7. The role of correctional facilities as de facto mental health institutions and the importance of empathy, professionalism and understanding toward individuals experiencing severe mental illness. END_STATUTE